South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3156.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 23, Chapter 5, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 56-5-2956. All evidence of the suspension of a person's driver's license pursuant to Section 56-5-2951, and any entry on the person's motor vehicle driving record that he was issued a temporary driver's license pursuant to that section or was required to install an ignition interlock device on a vehicle that he drives must be removed from the motor vehicle driving record of a person acquitted of a violation of Section 56-5-2930, 56-5-2933, or 56-5-2945. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----